Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 4. Taylor Grazing Act Funds

§ 9-4-401.
Distribution of funds.

All funds received by the state of Wyoming, as its distributive share of the amounts collected by the United States government under the provisions of the act of congress of June 28, 1934 (48 Stat. 1269), known as the Taylor Grazing Act [43 U.S.C. § 315 et seq.], and any act amendatory thereof, shall be deposited with the state treasurer. Upon receipt the state treasurer shall distribute the money to the several counties of the state in which the public lands are located. The state treasurer shall ascertain from the proper United States officers having the records of receipt from leased or sold public lands the amount of receipts from the sources in this state for each year for which money is received by the state. A separate account shall be kept of the sum received from sale or lease rentals from public lands, which sum shall be segregated by the state treasurer and paid to the county in which the leased or sold public land is located. If any leased or sold land lies in more than one (1) county of the state, each county shall receive a proportional amount of the revenue as the area of the leased or sold public land included within the boundary of the county bears to the total area of the leased or sold public land.

In the case of monies received from grazing fees, the state treasurer shall distribute the fees attributable to the following federal grazing districts as constituted prior to the reorganization of the district boundaries as implemented in 1974 by the bureau of land management to the following county treasurers to be held on behalf of the state grazing districts encompassing the county in the percentages indicated:

Worland grazing district:

Big Horn county treasurer (state grazing district 1) — 42.23%;

Hot Springs county treasurer (state grazing district 1) — 15.93%;

Park county treasurer (state grazing district 1) — 10.04%;

Washakie county treasurer (state grazing district 1) — 31.80%.

Rawlins grazing district:

Fremont county treasurer (state grazing district 2) — 31.57%;

Natrona county treasurer (state grazing district 2) — 5.46%;

Carbon county treasurer (state grazing district 3) — 33.71%;

Albany county treasurer (state grazing district 3) — .03%;

Sweetwater county treasurer (state grazing district 3) — 29.23%.

Rock Springs grazing district:

Sweetwater county treasurer (state grazing district 4) — 48.56%;

Fremont county treasurer (state grazing district 4) — 3.00%;

Lincoln county treasurer (state grazing district 4) — 17.66%;

Uinta county treasurer (state grazing district 4) — 8.27%;

Sublette county treasurer (state grazing district 5) — 22.51%.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 57, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 20-401; W.S. 1957, § 9-569; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-701; Laws 1980, ch. 6, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

For Wyoming Funds Consolidation Act, see art. 2 of this chapter.

As to exchange of state-owned and federal-owned lands in connection with Taylor Grazing Act, see §

36-1-106

.

As to preference in leasing exchanged lands under Taylor Grazing Act, see §

36-5-107

.

Bureau of land management. —

The bureau of land management was created in the federal department of the interior by Reorg. Plan of 1946 No. 3, Part IV, § 403, which appears as a note to
5 U.S.C. § 903.

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

For article, “Fifty Years of Rhetoric on the Range: Reframing the Debate on Public Land Management,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 339 (1997).

For article, “The Bureau of Land Management: A Half-Century of Challenges and Change,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 345 (1997).

For article, “The Rise and Fall of Grazing Reform,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 413 (1997).

§ 9-4-402.
Money credited to general school fund; allocation thereof.

All money received from the lease and sale of public lands within the county shall be placed to the credit of the general school fund of the county, to be proportionately allocated by the county treasurer to the various school districts, exclusive of high school districts, in which the public lands are located and from which the funds are derived.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 57, § 2; 1945, ch. 33, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 20-402; W.S. 1957, § 9-570; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-702; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

§ 9-4-403.
Money credited to range improvement fund; duties and liability of county treasurer.

All money received from grazing fees of a grazing district regularly established and including public lands shall be placed to the credit of a special fund to be designated “The Range Improvement Fund of Grazing District No. …”. The county treasurer of the county to which the fees are distributed is the ex officio district treasurer of the district encompassing the county as indicated by W.S. 9-4-401(b) and shall collect, receive, receipt and account for all monies from this source and is liable upon his official bond for the proper care and distribution of the monies.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 57, § 3; 1939, ch. 2, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 20-403; W.S. 1957, § 9-571; Laws 1976, ch. 20, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-703; Laws 1979, ch. 26, § 2; 1980, ch. 6, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-4-404.
Expenditure of range improvement fund; cooperative agreements.

Revenue under W.S.

9-4-403

shall be paid out by the county treasurer as requested by the state district grazing board upon written approval signed by the chairman of the state district grazing board as attested to by the secretary of the board.

Each state district grazing board may pay monies out of the range improvement fund of its grazing district:

For the construction and maintenance of range improvements, or any other purpose beneficial to the district. None of the funds shall be used for projects involving construction or maintenance, or both, of range improvements on public or state lands unless some legally constituted and authorized federal, state, county or city department, division, bureau, service, board or commission authorizes the project concerned;

For the payment of proper administrative salaries, costs and expenses of the board;

For contributions to the central committee of Wyoming state district grazing boards to defray costs and expenses for activities and projects incurred by the central committee under the written authorization of the state district grazing boards.

Any project involving construction and maintenance of range improvements on public lands within any grazing district established under the provisions of the Taylor Grazing Act [43 U.S.C. § 315 et seq.] shall be undertaken only under cooperative agreements between the state district grazing boards and the federal officials in charge of the district concerned. Any project that is within the jurisdiction of a government entity and does not involve construction or maintenance of range improvements shall be undertaken only under cooperative agreements entered into by the state district grazing boards and appropriate governmental entities.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 57, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 20-404; W.S. 1957, § 9-572; Laws 1976, ch. 20, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-704; Laws 1979, ch. 26, § 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Rise and Fall of Grazing Reform,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 413 (1997).

§ 9-4-405.
State district grazing boards; district boundaries.

A state board for each Taylor Grazing Act district established in Wyoming is created to direct and guide the disposition of the range improvement funds under W.S.

9-4-403

of each Taylor Grazing Act district (48 Stat. 1269) in the state. The distribution shall be most beneficial to the permittees from whom the funds are derived and for the counties involved in each district.

Each board shall be known respectively as the Wyoming State Grazing Board of District . . . . . in accordance with the following designations:

Worland district;

Lander district;

Rawlins district;

Rock Springs district;

Pinedale district.

District boundaries shall be substantially the same as boundaries set for the federal grazing districts as constituted prior to the reorganization of the district boundaries as implemented in 1974 by the bureau of land management, according to the map filed in the state department of agriculture.

Each state district board shall consist of not less than five (5) nor more than nine (9) permittees who hold section 3 [43 U.S.C. § 315b], Taylor Grazing Act permits and graze livestock upon the public lands within the grazing district for which the state grazing board is created. Officers and directors of corporations and partners of partnerships, or their designated representatives, who conduct the grazing are qualified to serve on the boards on behalf of the corporation or partnership. The term of each member is three (3) years except as provided for in subsection (e) of this section, beginning on January 1 after his election.

In November of each year, each state district grazing board shall conduct an election to fill any existing vacancies. If any vacancy occurs on a state district grazing board for any reason, the remaining board members shall select a qualified successor to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term.

A duly qualified person elected to serve as a member of a state district grazing board shall assume office after taking an oath for the performance of his duties. The permittees holding section 3 [43 U.S.C. § 315b], Taylor Grazing Act permits to graze livestock on the public lands within the grazing district served by a state district grazing board shall elect the members to serve on that state district grazing board, and each permittee or his designated representative is entitled to one (1) vote.

Each state district grazing board shall appoint a chairman and a nominating committee representative of each geographical area serving on the board, but not including any members of the board, and the committee shall make nominations to fill the expiring positions on the board. Nominations, together with appropriate space for write-in candidates, shall be circulated to the permittees within the district, so that each member may cast his vote for each vacancy on the board. The carryover members of the state district grazing board shall certify the results of the election.

Each state district grazing board shall select its own chairman and secretary from its membership. Employees may be hired by each board. The board shall set the remuneration of each employee and the remuneration shall be considered as administrative expense of the board concerned. The members of each state district grazing board shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed under W.S.

9-3-102

and

9-3-103

for travel and per diem expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

Meetings of a state district grazing board may be called at any time by the chairman or a majority of the members of the board. The board shall meet at least twice each year. Each board may adopt its own rules and regulations for the calling and holding of meetings, but a majority of each board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business by the board. Action by each board shall be determined by a majority vote of the members present.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 26, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-705; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Bureau of land management. —

See same catchline in notes following §

9-4-401

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Fifty Years of Rhetoric on the Range: Reframing the Debate on Public Land Management,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 339 (1997).

For article, “The Bureau of Land Management: A Half-Century of Challenges and Change,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 345 (1997).

For article, “The Rise and Fall of Grazing Reform,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 413 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Confidentiality of proceedings or reports of judicial inquiry board or commission, 5 ALR4th 730.

§ 9-4-406.
Grazing board central committee.

State district grazing boards may establish a central committee to act together in matters of common interest which shall be known as the central committee of Wyoming state grazing boards. The central committee consists of two (2) members selected by and from the membership of each of the state district grazing boards. The members shall serve at the pleasure of their respective state district grazing boards.

The central committee shall:

Select its own officers, secretary, advisors, consultants, and have committees it deems necessary;

Adopt its own rules for the calling and holding of meetings and the carrying out of instructions received from a majority of the state district grazing boards.

State district grazing boards may use the central committee as they deem proper. The central committee shall not engage in any activity or project except when and as authorized by a majority of the state district grazing boards. The central committee shall not incur any expense incident to its duties and activities except as authorized by a majority of the state district grazing boards.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 26, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-706; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.